Florida, session 2026, HB6529.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
88
89 Section 1. The facts stated in the preamble to this act
90 are found and declared to be true.
91 Section 2. The sum of $20 million is appropriated from the
92 General Revenue Fund to the Department of Children and Families
93 for the relief of C.C. for injuries and damages sustained.
94 Section 3. The Chief Financial Officer is directed to draw
95 a warrant in favor of C.C., payable to an irrevocable trust
96 created for the exclusive use and benefit of C.C., in the sum of
97 $20 million upon funds of the Department of Children and
98 Families in the State Treasury, and the Chief Financial Officer
99 is directed to pay the same out of such funds in the State
100 Treasury. The trust shall be responsible for payment of attorney
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6529-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S

HB 6529 2026
101 fees and costs, lobbying fees, and other similar expenses
102 relating to this claim, subject to the limitations set forth in
103 this act.
104 Section 4. The amount awarded under this act is intended
105 to provide the sole compensation for all present and future
106 claims arising out of the factual situation described in this
107 act which resulted in injuries and damages to C.C. The total
108 amount paid for attorney fees and costs, lobbying fees, and
109 other similar expenses relating to this claim may not exceed 25
110 percent of the total amount awarded under this act.
111 Section 5. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6529-00